Tennessee, session 114, HB1286.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 68, Chapter 4, is amended by adding
the following as a new section:
(a) If the person or government agency assuming custody of a body for the
purposes of burial does not request an autopsy pursuant to § 68-4-111, or that the body
be embalmed, then the person or government agency must ensure that the body is
buried within forty-eight (48) hours from the time when the person or government agency
waives the ability to request an autopsy or embalming of the body.
(b) Subsection (a) does not apply when an autopsy may be requested in
accordance with the Post-Mortem Examination Act, compiled in title 38, chapter 7, or
another law that allows this state or a political subdivision of this state to request an
autopsy due to the circumstances surrounding the death of the decedent.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1286
002915
- 1 -